District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.17

Penalties; prosecution by Attorney General.

(a)

Any person who wilfully violates any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under or order issued pursuant to § 42-1904.12 or any person who wilfully in an application for registration makes any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state a material fact shall be fined not less than $1,000 or double the amount of gain from the transaction, whichever is the larger but not more than $50,000; or such person may be imprisoned for not more than 6 months; or both, for each offense. Prosecution for violations of this chapter shall be brought in the name of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or his assistants.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this subchapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this subchapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 417, 23 DCR 9532b
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 420, 32 DCR 4450
1981 Ed., § 45-1877.
1973 Ed., § 5-1277.